Florida, session 2026, HB999.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 604.74, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
604.74 Refrigerant safety and agricultural continuity.—
(1) This section may be cited as the "Refrigerant Safety
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb999-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 999 2026
and Agricultural Continuity Act."
(2) The Legislature finds that this state's agricultural
food processing and cold chain industries rely upon refrigerant
systems that ensure product safety, temperature stability, and
export reliability. The United States Environmental Protection
Agency's technology transition rule requires replacement of R-
410A refrigerants with A2L refrigerants, including R-454B
refrigerants, beginning in calendar years 2025 and 2026. R-454B
refrigerant is classified as a mildly flammable refrigerant and
has not been fully tested or certified for all commercial
agricultural refrigerant applications, creating potential risk
of fire, equipment failure, and insurance exclusion. A rapid
transition to A2L refrigerants may impose substantial costs on
this state's agricultural food processing and cold chain
industries with statewide economic impacts estimated in the
billions of dollars. It is in the public interest to protect
safety, food supply integrity, and small business continuity
during the refrigerant transition period. It is the intent of
the Legislature to ensure the safety, economic stability, and
operational continuity of this state's agricultural food
processing and cold chain industries by authorizing the
continued use of R-410A refrigerant until alternative
refrigerants such as R-454B refrigerants are proven safe, fully
certified, and supported by adequate equipment availability,
workforce training, and insurance coverage.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb999-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 999 2026
(3) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Agricultural refrigerant application" means any
cooling or cold storage system used for agricultural production
or food processing, packaging, or transport.
(b) "A2L refrigerant" means any refrigerant classified as
lower toxicity and mildly flammable under American Society of
Heating, Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers Standard
34.
(c) "Department" means the Department of Agriculture and
Consumer Services.
(4) Notwithstanding any federal phase-down schedule or
other conflicting law, this state's agricultural food processing
and cold chain industries may continue to purchase, install, and
service equipment utilizing R-410A refrigerant through January
1, 2035, or until otherwise determined by the Legislature. The
department shall maintain records of R-410A equipment
installations and coordinate with relevant federal agencies to
ensure compliance with applicable reporting requirements.
(5) By January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
department, in consultation with the Department of Environmental
Protection and the State Fire Marshal, shall provide a report to
the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives on:
(a) Safety performance data for A2L refrigerants,
including R-454B refrigerants.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb999-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 999 2026
(b) Availability of compliant equipment and certified
technicians for statewide transition to A2L refrigerants.
(c) Insurance and liability standards applicable to A2L
refrigerant systems.
(d) Recommendations regarding readiness for statewide
transition to A2L refrigerants.
(6) A person or business entity operating in compliance
with this section and using R-410A refrigerant may not be held
liable solely for continued use of such refrigerant under any
federal phase-down schedule until a state-certified safe
alternative is fully available.
(7) The department may coordinate with Florida College
System institutions, career centers, and industry trade
associations to expand training and certification programs for
the safe handling, installation, and servicing of A2L
refrigerants.
(8) The department may adopt rules to implement this
section.
(9) This section establishes this state's enforcement
discretion and safety timeline consistent with its interest in
agriculture and public safety and may not be construed to
preempt or contravene the authority of the United States
Environmental Protection Agency.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb999-00